Washington statutes.
RCW 36.13.100

Determination of population.

Whenever any provision of law refers to the population of a county for purposes of distributing funds or for any other purpose, the population of the respective counties shall be determined by the most recent census, population estimate by the office of financial management, or special county census as certified by the office of financial management.

[ 1991 c 363 s 45; 1963 c 4 s 36.13.100. Prior: 1949 c 92 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4200-6a.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Population determinations, office of financial management: Chapter 43.62 RCW.